Utah statutes.
53B-2a-107.   Campus presidents -- Appointments -- Duties.

(1) (a)  The president of the Utah College of Applied Technology shall, after consultation with a campus board of directors and with the approval of the board of trustees, appoint a campus president for a college campus.

(b)  A campus president shall serve as the chief administrative officer of the college campus.

(c)  A campus president does not need to have a doctorate degree, but shall have extensive experience in career and technical education.

(d)  A campus president is subject to regular review and evaluation administered by the Utah College of Applied Technology president, in cooperation with the campus board of directors, through a process approved by the board of trustees.

(e)  A campus president serves at the discretion of the Utah College of Applied Technology president, in cooperation with the campus board of directors and the board of trustees.

(2)  Each campus president of a college campus shall:

(a)  serve as the executive officer of the campus board of directors;

(b)  administer the day-to-day operations of the college campus;

(c)  consult with the campus board of directors; and

(d)  administer human resource policies and employee compensation plans in accordance with the requirements of the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees.



Amended by Chapter 346, 2009 General Session

